Tennessee, session 114, SB1834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-9-414, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(h) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a recovery vehicle, as defined in § 55-8-132,
may display a single, steady-burning or flashing blue light to the rear, but not the front, of
the vehicle when stationary and engaged in the recovery of, or otherwise providing
assistance to, another vehicle.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1834
011110
- 1 -